Utah statutes.
61-2a-3.   Education, Research, and Recovery Fund.
(1) (a)  There is created a restricted special revenue fund to be known as the
"Real Estate Education, Research, and Recovery Fund."
(b)  The actual interest earned on the fund shall be deposited into the fund.
(2)  At the commencement of each fiscal year, $100,000 shall be available in
the fund for satisfying judgments rendered against a person licensed under
Title 61, Chapter 2, Division of Real Estate.
